Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-163
Nance.

The county of Nance shall include all that territory included in and known as the Pawnee Indian reservation. It shall also include all of sections numbered six, seven, eighteen, nineteen, thirty and thirty-one, in township seventeen, north, of range eight, west, of the sixth principal meridian.

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 148;

Laws 1881, c. 37, § 1, p. 217;

R.S.1913, §§ 876, 877;

C.S.1922, §§ 778, 779;

C.S.1929, §§ 25-165, 25-166;

R.S.1943, § 22-163.